index.aff
# Ember dictionary affix file
# The settings, PFX and SFX are duplicated from the orginal SCOWL files
# found at http://wordlist.aspell.net/dicts/

# REPlace is used to provide alternatives when a mispelt word is found and
# the suggested spelling/format to replace the mispelt word. These can be used
# to enforce case, names and word forms in the Ember guides.  

# DO NOT change anything other than REP values!!

# 1 - Insert replacements in alphabetical order to make it easier to manage
# 2 - The number at the top of the REP list is the number of REPs.  The count must
#     match the number of REPS!!!
# 3 - if the replacement word is to be replaced with multiple words use an 
#     underscore for spaces - see EmberObserver

SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '
NOSUGGEST !

# ordinal numbers
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
ONLYINCOMPOUND c
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE n*1t
COMPOUNDRULE n*mp
WORDCHARS 0123456789

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0     re         .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I   0     in         .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un         .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C   0     de          .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0     dis         .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F   0     con         .

PFX K Y 1
PFX K   0     pro         .

SFX V N 2
SFX V   e     ive        e
SFX V   0     ive        [^e]

SFX N Y 3
SFX N   e     ion        e
SFX N   y     ication    y 
SFX N   0     en         [^ey] 

SFX X Y 3
SFX X   e     ions       e
SFX X   y     ications   y
SFX X   0     ens        [^ey]

SFX H N 2
SFX H   y     ieth       y
SFX H   0     th         [^y] 

SFX Y Y 1
SFX Y   0     ly         .

SFX G Y 2
SFX G   e     ing        e
SFX G   0     ing        [^e] 

SFX J Y 2
SFX J   e     ings       e
SFX J   0     ings       [^e]

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0     d          e
SFX D   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX D   0     ed         [^ey]
SFX D   0     ed         [aeiou]y

SFX T N 4
SFX T   0     st         e
SFX T   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX T   0     est        [aeiou]y
SFX T   0     est        [^ey]

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   0     r          e
SFX R   y     ier        [^aeiou]y
SFX R   0     er         [aeiou]y
SFX R   0     er         [^ey]

SFX Z Y 4
SFX Z   0     rs         e
SFX Z   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX Z   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX Z   0     ers        [^ey]

SFX S Y 4
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzhy]

SFX P Y 3
SFX P   y     iness      [^aeiou]y
SFX P   0     ness       [aeiou]y
SFX P   0     ness       [^y]

SFX M Y 1
SFX M   0     's         .

SFX B Y 3
SFX B   0     able       [^aeiou]
SFX B   0     able       ee
SFX B   e     able       [^aeiou]e

SFX L Y 1
SFX L   0     ment       .

# REP count must be exact!!!
REP 123
REP css CSS
REP configPaths configPath
REP ember Ember
REP emberjs Ember
REP ember-cli Ember_CLI
REP emberobserver Ember_Observer
REP EmberObserver Ember_Observer
REP eslint ESLint
REP github GitHub
REP Github GitHub
REP htmlbars HTMLBars
REP indepth in-depth
REP js JS
REP javascript JavaScript
REP jslint JSLint
REP JSlint JSLint
REP jquery jQuery
REP JQuery jQuery
REP MD5 md5
REP minifycss minifyCSS
REP minifyjs minifyJS
REP NPM npm
REP postgressql PostgreSQL
REP postgress PostgreSQL
REP PostgresSQL PostgreSQL
REP Qunit QUnit
REP semver SemVer
REP Sember SemVer
REP subfoler subdirectory
REP subfolders subdirectories
REP testem Testem
REP vscode VSCode
REP Websocket WebSocket
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP alot a_lot
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP ear air
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion
REP size cise
