index.dic
Bernbach/M
Confucius/M
Ferlinghetti/M
Horatio/M
Leicester/SM
Lutheranism/MS
Mondale/M
Ore/N
Popocatepetl/M
Ru/MH
Siemens/M
Vijayawada/M
abrogate/XGNDS
acacia/MS
acclimate/DSGN
accumulate/XGNVDS
active/IKY
adapt/BZGVDRS
add/SDRBZG
adjourn/DGLS
adjudicate/GNVXDS
adorned/U
affect/EGDS
affirmation/AMS
affluent/Y
afforest/EGSD
affront/GMDS
age/DSMGJ
aggravate/GNXDS
aggregate/MGNDSX
agree/EBLDS
alienable/IU
almoner/SM
amateurish/YP
amen/B
amputate/GNDSX
amuse/LGDS
annihilator/SM
annotate/DSXGNV
announce/DRSLZG
announced/U
appearance/EAMS
appoint/AELSVGD
appointment's/A
approximate/DSXYGN
arguable/IU
armament/AEM
arrange/AESDLG
articulate/YGNPDSX
ascend/AGDS
ash/MDNSG
assail/GBDS
assessment/ASM
asseverate/DSGN
attribute/DSMGNVBX
audibly/I
averse/XN
avow/EDGS
aware/UP
b/KDT
babel/MS
bad/MYP
baffle/MZGDRSL
ballsy/RT
bank/SZGBMDR
baptize/ZGDRS
bark/CSGD
barkeep/ZMRS
barker/SM
barrel/GSMD
base/CDSLTG
basement/CMS
bashful/PY
bate/KACGSD
bear/SZGBJMR
believer/EUMS
belittle/LDSG
billboard/MS
billion/MHS
black/PXTGMDNRYS
blanch/GDS
blarney/SMDG
bleach/MDRSZG
blond/PTMRS
blue/DRSPMTG
bluff/ZTGPMDRYS
book/SBJGMD
boot/ASGD
bow/ZGSMDR
brazen/SDYGP
bread/GMDHS
break/BMZGRS
bring/SRZG
brocade/DSMG
brood/SMDRZG
brook/SMDG
brusque/RPYT
buckle/UDSG
bulky/RTP
bunk/CDGS
burrow/SMDRZG
cajole/ZGLDRS
calculable/I
calibrate/GNDSX
caper/GMD
capitulate/ADSXGN
captain/SMDG
carouse/DRSMZG
carve/JZGDRS
cat/SM
catalog/ZGSMDR
cease/CMGDS
certificate/MGNXDS
cession/KAFSM
ch/IFVT
chaste/PYTR
chilblain/SM
chilling/Y
choice/MTRS
chopper/MDGS
chrome/MGDS
circumnavigate/XGNDS
cite/IAGSD
claim/CKEAGDS
clang/ZGMDRS
classy/TRP
claw/CSGD
cleanliness/UM
clear/JPTGMDRYS
clipping/SM
close/DRSMYTGJP
color/AEGDS
combust/SGVD
commencement/AM
commend/ASDBG
comment/GSMD
commiserate/GNVDSX
commode/EIS
commonweal/MH
competency/IM
comport/LSGD
compress/CGDS
computational/Y
conceivably/I
conform/ZB
confuse/RZ
congregate/GNDSX
conjunct/VMS
connect/AEDVGS
connected/U
consecrate/ADSGN
consideration/AIM
consular/K
containerize/DSG
contentious/YP
continence/IM
continuity/ESM
controlled/UC
coordinate/DSMYGN
copious/PY
copter/SM
copulate/GNVDS
cosign/ZGSDR
costly/PTR
count/EASMDG
courtesy/ESM
cowl/MGSJ
crease/ICGMSD
creation's/K
cross/AUGTSD
crumbly/TPR
cub/ZGSMDR
cuddle/DSMG
cultivate/BDSGN
cure/KZGBDRS
curly/RPT
current/FAY
dainty/RSMTP
damn/SBGMD
damp/SPXZTGMDNRY
date/DRSMZGV
dded/K
deathless/Y
decent/IY
definable/IU
deliberate/XYVP
deliver/ADGS
denigrate/DSGN
deodorize/DRSZG
dermatologist/SM
descend/FGDS
desire/B
detach/BLGDS
developed/U
diamondback/MS
dick/MRXZS
different/IY
diffuse/DSYGNVP
discern/LSDG
discreet/PRYT
disrupt/GVSD
distillate/SMNX
distort/GDR
distributor/AS
divest/SLDG
divide/DRSMZGB
divisibility/IM
divvy/DSMG
do/SJMRHZG
dodder/SMDG
dogged/PY
done/FAU
duct's/K
duplicator/MS
dusty/RTP
dutiful/YP
dye/DRSMZG
e/FDST
earned/U
edge/MZGJDRS
educate/ADSGNV
eighteen/MHS
eleven/SMH
emasculation/M
embarkation/EM
embitter/GLDS
emigrate/DSXGN
emote/XDSGNV
encapsulate/XGNDS
enchant/ELDGS
encode/DRSZG
endow/SDLG
engage/EADSG
enjoy/GBLSD
enroll/DLSG
enter/ASGD
enthrone/GDSL
equitable/I
er/C
erase/DRSBZG
escape/LMGDS
eschew/SDG
escort/SMDG
eternal/YP
excused/U
execute/BXGNVDS
expanse/XMNVS
expectorate/DSGN
explicable/I
export/BSZGMDR
faddish/P
faithless/PY
falsify/DRSZGNX
falter/GSJMD
fasten/UAGDS
favor/ESMDG
federation/FM
ferment/FCMS
fess/FKGSD
fiddly/TR
fifty/SMH
fighting/IM
figure/FEGSD
file/CAKGDS
fine/CAFTGDS
fingermark/S
firehouse/SM
fix/ZGBJMDRS
fixate/GNVDSX
flatter/SDRZG
flimsy/TRP
flout/SMDRZG
fluoridate/GNDS
focused/U
fogged/C
foolhardy/TPR
for/H
forgetful/YP
formation/CFASM
formatted/A
forthright/YP
found/FSDG
four/MHS
frequency/IM
fright/SXGMDN
front/FSDG
frost/CSDG
furbish/ADSG
fusion/IFKSM
fuzzy/PTR
g/SNXVB
gather/SJZGMDR
gauche/RPYT
generation/ACM
geniality/FM
girlish/YP
glorification/M
go/JMRHZG
gory/RTP
govern/DGSBL
governable/U
grade/CADSG
graph/MDG
grasp/SMDBG
grease/DRSMZG
green/GPSMDRYT
greet/ZGJSDR
gridlock/SMD
grin/MS
gust/EMDSG
ha/SH
hallucinate/GNXDS
hammer/MDRSJZG
hateful/PY
hazy/RTP
hear/AHGJS
help/MDRZGSJ
helpless/PY
hitch/UDSG
hoagie/MS
hold/MRJSZG
huffy/PRT
humiliate/DSGNX
ice/CDSG
illicit/YP
imitate/DSGNVX
implant/BSGMD
impose/ADSG
imprecate/DSXGN
impress/MDSGV
imprison/SDLG
inanity/SM
incentive/ES
infatuate/DSXGN
informative/PY
inheritance/EM
inky/RTP
innovate/XDSGNV
inspiring/U
insure/DRSZGB
integration/EAM
intent/SMYP
interline/GDSJ
interrogate/DSGNVX
intrepidity/M
inundate/XDSGN
investment/AEM
j/F
jigging/A
joiner/FMS
joyride/RSMZG
judicious/IYP
juice/DRSMZG
k/IFGS
keel/MDSG
lactate/GNDS
lapse/AKGMSD
large/RSPMYT
lead/MDNRSZG
lemme/JG
lettered/U
liberation/CM
licentious/YP
lick/MDJSG
liverymen/C
load/AUGSD
lock/MDRSBZG
long/KDSTG
lordly/TPR
lucid/PY
lumber/MDRZGS
lynch/JZGDRS
ma/SMH
maltreat/GLDS
manipulate/XGNVDS
mask/UDSG
masturbate/GNDS
me/DSH
mediate/ADSGN
member/EAS
meticulous/YP
midweek/MS
mint/MDRSZG
miser/SBMY
misread/GJS
mo/CKHS
mockingbird/SM
mod/STM
monetize/CGDS
motion/KCM
murder/ZGMDRS
muse/MGDSJ
mute/MYTGDRSPB
mutilate/DSGNX
nationalize/CDSG
negate/DSGNVX
neglect/SGMD
negotiate/ADSGN
nifty/TR
nineteen/SMH
nitrate/DSMGN
nix/GMDS
nosy/RPT
noun/KMS
nourish/DSLG
observe/DRSBZG
obstructed/U
orchestrate/DSXGN
order/EAMDGS
organically/I
outgrow/HGS
overact/GVSD
overawe/DSG
overestimate/MGNDS
pa/SMH
paddock/MDGS
pale/MYTGPDRSJ
pane/KM
parochial/Y
passion/EM
pasture/DSMG
patron/MS
pend/CDSG
perceive/BGDS
perverse/PXYN
petition/ZGMDRS
photoengrave/DRSJZG
pig/SML
plat/XGMDNS
pleasant/UTYP
pol/SGMD
populate/ACGDS
port/CAEGDS
portend/SGD
pose/CAKEGDS
position/CKEMS
positioned/K
pound/KDSG
precipitate/XMYGNDS
predicate/MGNVDS
predict/BGVSD
preserve/BDRSMZG
pretty/TGDRSMP
prick/MDRYSZG
programmed/AC
pronounce/DSLG
proofread/SRZG
proportionate/EY
prospect/MDGVS
protected/U
pry/ZTGDRSM
purposeful/YP
quench/ZGDRSB
quest/IFAMS
quo/H
rampage/DSMG
rank/TGJPMDRYS
rate/JXMZGNDRS
ratiocinate/GNDS
reclamation/M
recoup/DG
redbird/SM
reflect/GVSD
registered/U
reimburse/BDSGL
relate/DRSBXZGNV
relinquish/LDSG
reminiscent/Y
resist/SMDRZG
respectful/EY
rev/ZVM
rigorous/YP
rise/JMZGRS
roister/ZGDRS
round/PSMDRYZTG
route/ADSG
rule/MZGJDRS
ruminate/XGNVDS
s/NYXB
salt/CTGDS
sanctify/GDSN
sanctioned/U
scale/CGDS
scribe/CKIS
scrounge/DRSZG
sect/IMS
segregated/U
selenographer/MS
sensitize/CDSG
sequential/FY
seventeen/SMH
sexy/PTR
shaky/RPT
shameless/YP
shifty/RPT
shill/GMDSJ
short/XTGMDNRYSP
signor/FMS
similarity/ESM
six/MSH
sixty/SMH
skateboard/MDRSZG
smartypants/M
sneak/SMDRZG
snooty/PTR
snowboard/ZGMDRS
snowy/PRT
solute/AXN
solvable/IU
solve/EADSG
splosh/DSG
spoil/CSDRZG
spoiled/U
squib/SM
stalk/SMDRJZG
starve/DSJG
state/DRSMYGNLX
steal/SMHG
steep/SMDNRYPXTG
stimulate/DSGNV
stingy/RTP
stolid/RYTP
straddle/DRSMZG
strain/FADSG
strange/PRYZT
strategical/Y
survive/DSGB
susceptible/I
suspected/U
suspend/SDRZG
tabulate/DSGNX
tasteful/EPY
tax/BZGMDRS
televise/XGNDS
tell/AGS
temp/MDRZTGS
temporary/FSM
ten/BMH
termination/CSM
terry/RMZ
test/AKFCDGS
testable/CF
tetchy/PRT
the/JG
therm/SM
thrash/JMDRSZG
timekeeping/M
tonal/Y
tone/IZGDRS
tour/CFSGDM
traceable/U
tract/CEKFAS
traction/EFACKM
tractor/FCKMS
treason/BM
treble/MGDS
tribute/FS
trillion/SMH
tun/SZGMDR
umpire/MGDS
undulate/DSXGN
unripe/TR
uplift/JSMDG
valuation/CAMS
value/CAGSD
vault/SMDRZG
ventilate/GNDS
venturous/PY
verse/AFNGMSDX
vest/ILDGS
vicarious/YP
vicegerent/SM
vision/KGDSM
vote/CGVDS
warily/U
wassail/SMDG
weal/MHS
whiten/ZGDRJ
windsurf/ZGDRS
wither/JGD
woody/TPRSM
worthy/UPRT
wrinkly/TRSM
yammer/SZGMDR
zipping/U
